apertium-arg.arg.dix
<pardef n="conoix/er__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>co</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>es</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>


  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>é</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>qui</l>       <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>i</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>         <r>er<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="cono/cer__vblex">
  <e>       <p><l>zco</l>       <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ces</l>       <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>z</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>


  <e>       <p><l>cen</l>       <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pri12pl_emos__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cé</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pimpi_ba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="indefi_o__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="futuro_re__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ce</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_ria__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ce</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba__cnjgt"/></e>
    
  <e r="LR"><p><l>cé</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="cond_rba_acc__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>zc</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prs12pl_amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zc</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="prsrest_a__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_ese__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pis_erai__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/e__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zc</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/a__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>zc</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ci</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/amos__cnjgt"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="imp_vend/etz__cnjgt"/></e>
  
  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="inf_er__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>c</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_endo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>c</l>         <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="ger_indo__cnjgt"/></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ci</l>        <r>ixer<s n="vblex"/></r></p><par n="pp_u__cnjgt"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="apeteixer">      <i>apet</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="apeteixer"><i>apete</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="achapeixer">      <i>achap</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acayeixer">       <i>acay</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="acayeixer"><i>acaye</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="acreixer">        <i>acr</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="agradeixer">      <i>agrad</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="amaneixer">       <i>aman</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="apareixer">       <i>apar</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compadeixer">     <i>compad</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="compareixer">     <i>compar</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="conoixer"> <p><l>cone</l>      <r>cono</r></p><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="conoixer">        <i>cono</i><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="creixer">         <i>cr</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="decreixer">       <i>decr</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desapareixer">    <i>desapar</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desconoixer"><p><l>descone</l> <r>descono</r></p><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desconoixer">     <i>descono</i><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="desobedeixer">    <i>desobed</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desapareixer"><p><l>despar</l> <r>desapar</r></p><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="esvaneixer"><p><l>desvan</l>   <r>esvan</r></p><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desapareixer"><p><l>disapar</l><r>desapar</r></p><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="escayeixer">      <i>escay</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desconoixer"><p><l>escono</l>  <r>descono</r></p><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="esmorteixer">     <i>esmort</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="esmorteixer"><i>esmorte</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="favoreixer">      <i>favor</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="mereixer">        <i>mer</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="obedeixer">       <i>obed</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="padeixer">        <i>pad</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="perteneixer">     <i>perten</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="reconoixer">      <i>recono</i><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="renaixer">        <i>rena</i><par n="/ix_x__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="sobreixer">       <i>sobr</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="acayeixer"><p><l>acai</l>      <r>acaye</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="acreixer"> <i>acre</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="agradeixer"><i>agrade</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="amaneixer"><i>amane</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="apareixer"><i>apare</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="compadeixer"><i>compade</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="compareixer"><i>compare</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="conoixer"> <p><l>conix</l>     <r>conoix</r></p><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="conoixer"> <p><l>cono</l>      <r>cono</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="creixer">  <i>cre</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="decreixer"><i>decre</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desapareixer"><i>desapare</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desconoixer"><p><l>descono</l> <r>descono</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desobedeixer"><i>desobede</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desapareixer"><p><l>despare</l><r>desapare</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="esvaneixer"><p><l>desvane</l>  <r>esvane</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desapareixer"><p><l>disapare</l><r>desapare</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desapareixer"><p><l>dispare</l><r>desapare</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="escayeixer"><p><l>escai</l>    <r>escaye</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="escayeixer"><p><l>escaix</l>   <r>escayeix</r></p><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="escayeixer"><i>escaye</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="desconoixer"><p><l>escono</l>  <r>descono</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="escureixer"><i>escure</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="esvaneixer"><i>esvane</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="favoreixer"><i>favore</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="mereixer"> <i>mere</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="obedeixer"><i>obede</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="pareixer"> <p><l>pae</l>       <r>pare</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="pareixer"> <p><l>pare</l>      <r>pare</r></p><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="prevaleixer">      <i>preval</i><par n="/eix_ix_ex__var"/><par n="conoix/er__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="prevaleixer"><i>prevale</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="remeixer"> <i>reme</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
<e r="LR" lm="resplandeixer"><i>resplande</i><par n="cono/cer__vblex"/></e>
